Utah statutes.
30-1-10.   Application by persons unknown to clerk -- Affidavit -- Penalty.

(1)  When the parties are personally unknown to the clerk a license may not be issued until an affidavit is made before the clerk, which shall be filed and preserved by the clerk, by a party applying for the license, showing that there is no lawful reason in the way of the marriage. 

(2)  A party who makes an affidavit described in Subsection (1) or a subscribing witness to the affidavit who falsely swears in the affidavit is guilty of perjury.



Amended by Chapter 297, 2011 General Session

